Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.323.010

Joint school districts—Defined—Designation.

Any school district composed of territory lying in more than one county shall be known as a joint school district, and shall be designated by number in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated under *RCW 28A.305.150.

[ 1990 c 33 s 309; 1973 c 47 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.230. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 25; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-44; prior: 1909 c 97 p 264 s 6; RRS s 4699; prior: 1897 c 118 s 13. Formerly RCW 28A.315.350, 28A.57.230, 28.57.230.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.305.150 was repealed by 1999 c 315 s 801. Later enactment, see RCW 28A.300.065.

Severability—1973 c 47: "If any provision of this 1973 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1973 c 47 s 6.]